test/src/gt-norm-yamls/sje-tests-list_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - rånntjo: # Even syll
    rånntjo+N+Sg+Gen: råntjo

  Noun - råvvgo: # Even syll
    råvggo+N+Sg+Gen: råvgo

  Noun - ruävvde: # Even syll
    ruävvde+N+Sg+Gen: ruovde

  Noun - rádje: # Even syll
    rádje+N+Sg+Gen: ráje

  Noun - rádna: # Even syll
    rádna+N+Sg+Gen: rádna

  Noun - ráffe: # Even syll
    ráffe+N+Sg+Gen: ráfe

  Noun - rájje: # Even syll
    rájje+N+Sg+Gen: ráje

  Noun - rássjo: # Even syll
    rássjo+N+Sg+Gen: rásjo

  Noun - rávdno: # Even syll
    rávdno+N+Sg+Gen: rávno

  Noun - rávnno: # Even syll
    rávnno+N+Sg+Gen: rávno

  Noun - rávve: # Even syll
    rávve+N+Sg+Gen: ráve

  Noun - räjjdo: # Even syll
    räjjdo+N+Sg+Gen: riejdo

  Noun - rännta: # Even syll
    rännta+N+Sg+Gen: ränta

  Noun - rässjme: # Even syll
    rässjme+N+Sg+Gen: riesjme

  Noun - rågge: # Even syll
    rågge+N+Sg+Gen: rågge

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - råhttje: # Even syll
    råhttje+N+Sg+Gen: råhtje

  Noun - rånttjo: # Even syll
    rånttjo+N+Sg+Gen: råntjo

  Noun - sajje: # Even syll
    sajje+N+Sg+Gen: saje
    
  Noun - sadje: # Even syll
    sadje+N+Sg+Gen: saje
    
  Noun - sarves: # Even syll
    sarves+N+Sg+Gen: sarvvá

  Noun - sassne: # Even syll
    sassne+N+Sg+Gen: sasne

  Noun - savvtsa: # Even syll
    savvtsa+N+Sg+Gen: savtsa

  Noun - savvun: # Even syll
    savvun+N+Sg+Gen: savvuna

  Noun - sievalådde: # Even syll
    sievalådde+N+Sg+Gen: sievalådde

  Noun - sijjda: # Even syll
    sijjda+N+Sg+Gen: sijda

  Noun - sillba: # Even syll
    sillba+N+Sg+Gen: silba

  Noun - sivvun: # Even syll
    sivvun+N+Sg+Gen: sivvuna

  Noun - skuojjve: # Even syll
    skuojjve+N+Sg+Gen: skuojve

  Noun - skuvvle: # Even syll
    skuvvle+N+Sg+Gen: skuvle

  Noun - skájjde: # Even syll
    skájjde+N+Sg+Gen: skájde

  Noun - skäŋŋga: # Even syll
    skäŋŋga+N+Sg+Gen: skäŋga

  Noun - skåvvlå: # Even syll
    skåvvlå+N+Sg+Gen: skåvlå

  Noun - stummpa: # Even syll
    stummpa+N+Sg+Gen: stumpa

  Noun - stuvvsa: # Even syll
    stuvvsa+N+Sg+Gen: stuvsa

  Noun - stállo: # Even syll
    stállo+N+Sg+Gen: stálo

  Noun - stállpe: # Even syll
    stállpe+N+Sg+Gen: stálpe

  Noun - stárrfo: # Even syll
    stárrfo+N+Sg+Gen: stárfo

  Noun - stáđđa: # Even syll
    stáđđa+N+Sg+Gen: stáđđa

  Noun - stänntjo: # Even syll
    stänntjo+N+Sg+Gen: stäntjo

  Noun - ståhpo: # Even syll
    ståhpo+N+Sg+Gen: ståbo

  Noun - suohkan: # Even syll
    suohkan+N+Sg+Gen: suohkana

  Noun - suoŋŋer: # Even syll
    suoŋŋer+N+Sg+Gen: suoŋŋera

  Noun - suptsas: # Even syll
    suptsas+N+Sg+Gen: supptsasa

  Noun - suäjdne: # Even syll
    suäjdne+N+Sg+Gen: suojne

  Noun - suäŋŋer: # Even syll
    suäŋŋer+N+Sg+Gen: suäŋŋera

  Noun - svallfo: # Even syll
    svallfo+N+Sg+Gen: svalfo

  Noun - sválltja: # Even syll
    sválltja+N+Sg+Gen: sváltja

  Noun - sábme: # Even syll
    sábme+N+Sg+Gen: sáme

  Noun - sáffta: # Even syll
    sáffta+N+Sg+Gen: sáfta

  Noun - sállte: # Even syll
    sállte+N+Sg+Gen: sálte

  Noun - sámesijjda: # Even syll
    sámesijjda+N+Sg+Gen: sámesijda

  Noun - sávvtsa: # Even syll
    sávvtsa+N+Sg+Gen: sávtsa

  Noun - säjjbe: # Even syll
    säjjbe+N+Sg+Gen: siejbe

  Noun - såhkevuobme: # Even syll
    såhkevuobme+N+Sg+Gen: såhkevuome

  Noun - tea: # Even syll
    tea+N+Sg+Gen: tea

  Noun - tjakktja: # Even syll
    tjakktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjaktja

  Noun - tjarrva: # Even syll
    tjarrva+N+Sg+Gen: tjarva

  Noun - tjäkktja: # Even syll
    tjäkktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjäktja

  Noun - tjuavvtja: # Even syll
    tjuavvtja+N+Sg+Gen: tjuovtja

  Noun - tjukktje: # Even syll
    tjukktje+N+Sg+Gen: tjuktje

  Noun - tjuvvde: # Even syll
    tjuvvde+N+Sg+Gen: tjuvde

  Noun - tjáhtje: # Even syll
    tjáhtje+N+Sg+Gen: tjátje

  Noun - tjáhtse: # Even syll
    tjáhtse+N+Sg+Gen: tjátse

  Noun - tjäkktja: # Even syll
    tjäkktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjäktja

  Noun - tjännsta: # Even syll
    tjännsta+N+Sg+Gen: tjiensta

  Noun - tjänntá: # Even syll
    tjänntá+N+Sg+Gen: tjäntá

  Noun - tjårrve: # Even syll
    tjårrve+N+Sg+Gen: tjårve

  Noun - tsuabbtsa: # Even syll
    tsuabbtsa+N+Sg+Gen: tsuobtsa

  Noun - tsuapptsa: # Even syll
    tsuapptsa+N+Sg+Gen: tsuoptsa

  Noun - ukksa: # Even syll
    ukksa+N+Sg+Gen: uksa

  Noun - vanas: # Even syll
    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: vatnasa

  Noun - vanntsa: # Even syll
    vanntsa+N+Sg+Gen: vantsa

  Noun - vassje: # Even syll
    vassje+N+Sg+Gen: vasje

  Noun - viellja: # Even syll
    viellja+N+Sg+Gen: vielja

  Noun - vierro: # Even syll
    vierro+N+Sg+Gen: viero

  Noun - vierrodimájjge: # Even syll
    vierrodimájjge+N+Sg+Gen: vierrodimájge

  Noun - vippsja: # Even syll
    vippsja+N+Sg+Gen: vipsja

  Noun - vuaksa: # Even syll
    vuaksa+N+Sg+Gen: vuaksa

  Noun - vuassa: # Even syll
    vuassa+N+Sg+Gen: vuosa

  Noun - vuobme: # Even syll
    vuobme+N+Sg+Gen: vuome

  Noun - vuobmelådde: # Even syll
    vuobmelådde+N+Sg+Gen: vuobmelådde

  Noun - vuolle: # Even syll
    vuolle+N+Sg+Gen: vuole

  Noun - vuärrbe: # Even syll
    vuärrbe+N+Sg+Gen: vuorbe

  Noun - vuäbbne: # Even syll
    vuäbbne+N+Sg+Gen: vuobne

  Noun - vuävvde: # Even syll
    vuävvde+N+Sg+Gen: vuovde

  Noun - vágge: # Even syll
    vágge+N+Sg+Gen: vágge

  Noun - vájbmo: # Even syll
    vájbmo+N+Sg+Nom: [vájbmo, vájmmo]
    vájbmo+N+Sg+Gen: vájmo

  Noun - várre: # Even syll
    várre+N+Sg+Gen: váre

  Noun - vähkke: # Even syll
    vähkke+N+Sg+Nom: vähkke
    vähkke+N+Sg+Gen: vähkke

  Noun - vällja: # Even syll
    vällja+N+Sg+Nom: vällja
    vällja+N+Sg+Gen: vielja

  Noun - Árjapluovve: # Even syll
    Árjapluovve+N+Sg+Nom: Árjapluovve
    Árjapluovve+N+Sg+Gen: Árjapluove

  Noun - áddjá: # Even syll
    áddjá+N+Sg+Nom: áddjá 
    áddjá+N+Sg+Gen: ádjá 

  Noun - áhkká: # Even syll
    áhkká+N+Sg+Nom: áhkká
    áhkká+N+Sg+Gen: áhká

  Noun - áhpe: # Even syll
    áhpe+N+Sg+Gen: ábe

  Noun - áhttje: # Even syll
    áhttje+N+Sg+Gen: áhtje

  Noun - ájjge: # Even syll
    ájjge+N+Sg+Gen: ájge

  Noun - ájjro: # Even syll
    ájjro+N+Sg+Gen: ájro

  Noun - ája: # Even syll
    ája+N+Sg+Gen: ádjaga

  Noun - ákksjo: # Even syll
    ákksjo+N+Sg+Gen: áksjo

  Noun - álldo: # Even syll
    álldo+N+Sg+Gen: áldo

  Noun - árrbe: # Even syll
    árrbe+N+Sg+Gen: árbe

  Noun - árrpo: # Even syll
    árrpo+N+Sg+Gen: árpo

  Noun - átjárájjde: # Even syll
    átjárájjde+N+Sg+Gen: átjárájde

  Noun - ávvke: # Even syll
    ávvke+N+Sg+Gen: ávke

  Noun - ávvo: # Even syll
    ávvo+N+Sg+Gen: ávo

  Noun - äddne: # Even syll
    äddne+N+Sg+Gen: iedne

  Noun - åbba: # Even syll
    åbba+N+Sg+Gen: åbba

  Noun - åbbá: # Even syll
    åbbá+N+Sg+Gen: åbbá

  Noun - åjvevuolle: # Even syll
    åjvevuolle+N+Sg+Gen: åjvevuole

  Noun - åkkse: # Even syll
    åkkse+N+Sg+Gen: åkse

  Noun - ålmáj: # Even syll
    ålmáj+N+Sg+Gen: ålbmá

  Noun - åsse: # Even syll
    åsse+N+Sg+Gen: åse
